Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201780-333
Contracts and other documents; how treated.

On and after July 1, 2017, whenever the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services is referred to or designated by any contract or other document in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs pursuant to the Nebraska Veterans Services Act, such reference or designation shall apply to such department. All contracts entered into by the division prior to July 1, 2017, in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the department are hereby recognized, with the department succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts shall be transferred and appropriated to the department for the payments of such obligations. All documents and records transferred, or copies of the same, may be authenticated or certified by the department for all legal purposes.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 13.
July 1, 2017